Florida, session 2026, HB393.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (3), paragraph (b) of subsection
(4), subsection (5), and paragraph (b) of subsection (6) of
Section 196.081, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
196.081 Exemption for certain permanently and totally
disabled veterans and for surviving spouses of veterans;
exemption for surviving spouses of first responders who die in
the line of duty.—
(3) If the totally and permanently disabled veteran
predeceases his or her spouse and if, upon the death of the
veteran, the spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the
homestead and permanently resides thereon as specified in s.
196.031, the exemption from taxation carries over to the benefit
of the veteran's spouse until such time as he or she remarries
or sells or otherwise disposes of the property. If the spouse
sells the property, the spouse may transfer an exemption not to
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb393-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 393 2026
exceed the amount granted from the most recent ad valorem tax
roll to his or her new residence, as long as it is used as his
or her primary residence and he or she does not remarry.
(4) Any real estate that is owned and used as a homestead
by the surviving spouse of a veteran who died from service-
connected causes while on active duty as a member of the United
States Armed Forces and for whom a letter from the United States
Government or United States Department of Veterans Affairs or
its predecessor has been issued certifying that the veteran who
died from service-connected causes while on active duty is
exempt from taxation.
(b) The tax exemption carries over to the benefit of the
veteran's surviving spouse as long as the spouse holds the legal
or beneficial title to the homestead, permanently resides
thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does not remarry. If the
surviving spouse sells the property, the spouse may transfer an
exemption not to exceed the amount granted under the most recent
ad valorem tax roll to his or her new residence as long as it is
used as his or her primary residence and he or she does not
remarry.
(5) An applicant for the exemption under this section may
apply for the exemption before receiving the necessary
documentation from the United States Government or the United
States Department of Veterans Affairs or its predecessor. Upon
receipt of the documentation, the exemption shall be granted as
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb393-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 393 2026
of the date when the applicant became eligible for such
exemption of the original application, and the excess taxes paid
shall be refunded. Any refund of excess taxes paid shall be
limited to those paid during the 4-year period of limitation set
forth in s. 197.182(1)(e).
(6) Any real estate that is owned and used as a homestead
by the surviving spouse of a first responder who died in the
line of duty while employed by the United States Government, the
state, or any political subdivision of the state, including
authorities and special districts, and for whom a letter from
the United States Government, the state, or appropriate
political subdivision of the state, or other authority or
special district, has been issued which legally recognizes and
certifies that the first responder died in the line of duty
while employed as a first responder is exempt from taxation.
(b) The tax exemption applies as long as the surviving
spouse holds the legal or beneficial title to the homestead,
permanently resides thereon as specified in s. 196.031, and does
not remarry. If the surviving spouse sells the property, the
spouse may transfer an exemption not to exceed the amount
granted under the most recent ad valorem tax roll to his or her
new residence if it is used as his or her primary residence and
he or she does not remarry.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb393-00